Illinois, session 104th, HB4174.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Prohibition on State Interference in Museum Content Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The General Assembly declares that it 7is the public policy of the State to protect the integrity of 8museum content against political censorship by (i) prohibiting 9governmental interference in museum exhibits and programming 10and events related to race, gender, or historical events, (ii) 11requiring museums that receive funding from the State to base 12exhibits on credible scholarship and inclusive narratives, and 13(iii) encouraging partnerships between museums and historians, 14educators, and cultural leaders to ensure balanced, fact-based 15exhibits. 16    Section 10. Definitions. 17    As used in this Act:18    "Local governmental unit" means any county, municipality, 19township, special district, school district, or community 20college.21    "Museum" means an institution or entity located in this 22State that:   HB4174- 2 -LRB104 15814 AAS 29014 b1        (1) is operated by the State, a local governmental 2    unit, a non-profit corporation, a trust, an association, 3    or an educational institution that receives State funds; 4        (2) is operated primarily for educational, scientific, 5    historic preservation, cultural, or aesthetic purposes; 6    and 7        (3) owns, borrows, cares for, exhibits, studies, 8    archives, or catalogues property. 9    "Museum" includes, but is not limited to, any one or more 10of the following institutions or entities that receive State 11funds: historical societies; historic sites; landmarks; parks; 12archives; monuments; botanical gardens; arboreta; zoos; nature 13centers; planetaria; aquaria; libraries; technology centers; 14and art, history, science, and natural history museums. 15    Section 15. Prohibition on State interference. Neither the 16State nor a local governmental unit shall interfere in the 17creation or content of (i) exhibits and programming in a 18museum or (ii) events in museums that are related to race, 19gender, or historical events. 20    Section 20. Publicly funded museums. A museum shall base 21its exhibits and programming on credible scholarship and 22inclusive narratives. 23    Section 25. Partnerships. A museum shall prioritize   HB4174- 3 -LRB104 15814 AAS 29014 b1partnerships between the museum and historians, educators, and 2cultural leaders regarding exhibits in the museum to ensure 3that the exhibits are balanced and fact-based. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 51, 2027.